test/src/morphology/A-havvske_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjektiv - gävvra: # -a-stammar
    gävvra+A+Sg+Nom: gävvra
    gävvra+A+Attr: gievras
    gävvra+A+Sg+Gen: gievra
    gävvra+A+Sg+Acc: gievrav
    gävvra+A+Sg+Ill: gävvraj
    gävvra+A+Sg+Ine: gievran
    gävvra+A+Sg+Ela: gievrast
    gävvra+A+Sg+Com: gievrajn
    gävvra+A+Pl+Nom: gievra
    gävvra+A+Pl+Gen: gievraj
    gävvra+A+Pl+Acc: gievrajt
    gävvra+A+Pl+Ill: gievrajda
    gävvra+A+Pl+Ine: gievrajn
    gävvra+A+Pl+Ela: gievrajst
    gävvra+A+Pl+Com: gievraj
    gävvra+A+Ess: gävvran
    gävvra+A+Abe: gievradak

  Adjektiv - nuorra: # -a-stammar
    nuorra+A+Sg+Nom: nuorra
    nuorra+A+Attr: nuorra
    nuorra+A+Sg+Gen: nuora
    nuorra+A+Sg+Acc: nuorav
    nuorra+A+Sg+Ill: nuorraj
    nuorra+A+Sg+Ine: nuoran
    nuorra+A+Sg+Ela: nuorast
    nuorra+A+Sg+Com: nuorajn
    nuorra+A+Pl+Nom: nuora
    nuorra+A+Pl+Gen: nuoraj
    nuorra+A+Pl+Acc: nuorajt
    nuorra+A+Pl+Ill: nuorajda
    nuorra+A+Pl+Ine: nuorajn
    nuorra+A+Pl+Ela: nuorajst
    nuorra+A+Pl+Com: nuoraj
    nuorra+A+Ess: nuorran
    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: nuorap
    nuorra+A+Comp+Attr: nuorap
    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: nuorabu
    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: nuorabuv
    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: nuorabuj
    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: nuorabun
    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: nuorabust
    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Com: nuorabujn
    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: nuorabu
    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: nuorabuj
    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: nuorabujt
    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: nuorabujda
    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: nuorabujn
    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: nuorabujst
    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Com: nuorabuj
    nuorra+A+Comp+Ess: nuorabun

  Adjektiv - tjáhppat: # -a-stammar
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Nom: tjáhppat
    tjáhppat+A+Attr: tjähppis
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Gen: tjáhppada
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Acc: tjáhppadav
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Ill: tjáhppadij
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Ine: tjáhppadin
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Ela: tjáhppadist
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Com: tjáhppadijn
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Nom: tjáhppada
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Gen: tjáhppadij
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Acc: tjáhppadijt
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Ill: tjáhppadijda
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Ine: tjáhppadijn
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Ela: tjáhppadijst
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Com: tjáhppadij
    tjáhppat+A+Ess: tjáhppadin
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjáhppadup
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Attr: tjáhppadup
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: tjáhppadubbo
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: tjáhppadubbov
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: tjáhppadubbuj
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: tjáhppadubbon
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: tjáhppadubbost
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Com: [tjáhppadubbujn, tjáhppadubbujna]
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: tjáhppadubbo
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: tjáhppadubboj
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: tjáhppadubbojt
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: tjáhppadubbojda
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: tjáhppadubbojn
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: tjáhppadubbojst
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Com: tjáhppadubboj
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Ess: tjáhppadubbon

  Adjektiv - hávvske: # -e-stammar
    hávvske+A+Sg+Nom: hávvske
    hávvske+A+Attr: hávskes
    hávvske+A+Sg+Gen: hávske
    hávvske+A+Sg+Acc: hávskev
    hávvske+A+Sg+Ill: hávvskáj
    hávvske+A+Sg+Ine: hávsken
    hávvske+A+Sg+Ela: hávskest
    hávvske+A+Sg+Com: hávskijn
    hávvske+A+Pl+Nom: hávske
    hávvske+A+Pl+Gen: hávskij
    hávvske+A+Pl+Acc: hávskijt
    hávvske+A+Pl+Ill: hávskijda
    hávvske+A+Pl+Ine: hávskijn
    hávvske+A+Pl+Ela: hávskijst
    hávvske+A+Pl+Com: hávskij
    hávvske+A+Ess: hávvsken
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: hávskep
    hávvske+A+Comp+Attr: hávskep
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: hávskebu
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: hávskebuv
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: hávskebuj
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: hávskebun
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: hávskebust
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Com: hávskebujn
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: hávskebu
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: hávskebuj
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: hávskebujt
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: hávskebujda
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: hávskebujn
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: hávskebujst
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Com: hávskebuj
    hávvske+A+Comp+Ess: hávskebun
